nl: Elektronica > Accessoires voor elektronica > Audio-/videosplitters en -schakelaars > VGA-splitters en -schakelaars: VGA splitters; VGA switches
tr: Elektronik > Elektronik Alet Aksesuarları > Ses ve Görüntü Ayırıcıları ve Anahtarları > VGA Ayırıcıları ve Anahtarları: VGA Bölücüler; VGA Anahtarlar
hu: Elektronika > Elektronikai kiegészítők > Audio- és videoelosztók és -kapcsolók > VGA elosztók és kapcsolók: VGA-elosztók; VGA-kapcsolók
sl-SI: Elektronika > Elektronski dodatki > Avdio in video razdelilniki in preklopniki > Razdelilniki in stikala VGA: VGA razdelilniki; VGA preklopniki
pl: Elektronika > Akcesoria elektroniczne > Rozdzielacze i przełączniki do przesyłania obrazu i dźwięku > Rozdzielacze i przełączniki VGA: Rozdzielacze VGA; Przełączniki VGA
sk-SK: Elektronika > Elektronické príslušenstvo > Rozbočovače a prepínače zvuku a videa > Rozbočovače a prepínače VGA: VGA rozdeľovače; VGA prepínače
sv: Elektronik > Elektroniktillbehör > Kabeldelare och omkopplare för video och ljud > VGA-delare och -omkopplare: VGA-fördelare; VGA-omkopplare
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Phụ kiện thiết bị điện tử > Bộ chia và công tắc âm thanh và hình ảnh > Công tắc và bộ chia VGA: Bộ tách VGA; Công tắc VGA
ko: 전자기기 > 전자기기 부대용품 > 오디오 및 비디오 스플리터/스위치 > VGA 스플리터/스위치: VGA 스플리터; VGA 스위치
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 電子配件 > AV 分配器/切換器 > VGA 分配器/切換器: VGA 分配器; VGA 切換器
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Acessórios para eletrônicos > Divisores e comutadores de áudio e vídeo > Divisores e comutadores VGA: Divisores VGA; Chaves VGA
nb: Elektronikk > Elektronikktilbehør > Lyd- og videosplittere og -brytere > VGA-splittere og -brytere: VGA-splittere; VGA-brytere
ru: Электроника > Аксессуары для электроники > Разветвители и коммутаторы аудио- и видеосигналов > Разветвители и коммутаторы VGA: VGA-разветвители; VGA-переключатели
fi: Elektroniikka > Sähkötarvikkeet > AV-jakajat ja -kytkimet > VGA-jakajat ja -kytkimet: VGA-jakajat; VGA-kytkimet
cs: Elektronika > Elektronika – příslušenství > AV rozbočovače a přepínače > Rozbočky a spínače VGA: VGA rozbočovače; VGA přepínače
ja: 電子機器 > 電気製品関連用品・PC周辺機器 > AVスプリッター・スイッチ > VGA スプリッター/スイッチ: VGAスプリッター; VGAスイッチャー
de: Elektronik > Elektronisches Zubehör > Audio- und Video-Splitter & -Switches > VGA-Splitter und -Switches: VGA-Splitter; VGA-Switches
da: Elektronik > Elektronik – tilbehør > Lyd og video – fordelere og omskiftere > VGA-splittere og -omskiftere: VGA-fordelere; VGA-omskiftere
hr-HR: Elektronika > Pribor za elektroniku > Audio i video razdjelnici i sklopke > VGA razdjelnici i sklopke: VGA razdjelnici; VGA prekidači
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Αξεσουάρ ηλεκτρονικών συσκευών > Διαχωριστές & διακόπτες ήχου & βίντεο > Διαχωριστές & διακόπτες VGA: Διαχωριστές VGA; Διακόπτες VGA
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 电子配件 > 音频和视频分配器和切换器 > VGA 分配器与开关: VGA 分路器; VGA 切换器
lt-LT: Elektronika > Elektronikos priedai > Garso ir vaizdo skirstytuvai ir jungikliai > VGA skirstytuvai ir jungikliai: VGA skirstytuvai; VGA jungikliai
en: Electronics > Electronics Accessories > Audio & Video Splitters & Switches > VGA Splitters & Switches: VGA Splitters; VGA Switches
ro-RO: Electronice > Accesorii electronice > Splittere și comutatoare audio și video > Splittere și comutatoare VGA: Splittere VGA; Switch-uri VGA
bg-BG: Електроника > Аксесоари за електроника > Аудио- и видеосплитери и превключватели > VGA сплитери и превключватели: VGA разделители; VGA превключватели
fr: Appareil électronique > Accessoires électroniques > Répartiteurs et commutateurs audio et vidéo > Répartiteurs et commutateurs VGA: Répartiteurs VGA; Commutateurs VGA
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Acessórios eletrónicos > Splitters e interrutores de áudio e vídeo > Splitters e interrutores de VGA: Divisores vga; Comutadores vga
it: Elettronica > Accessori dispositivi elettronici > Splitter e interruttori audio e video > Splitter e interruttori VGA: Splitter VGA; Switch VGA
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อุปกรณ์อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > สวิตช์และตลับแยก AV > กล่องและตลับแยกสาย VGA: ตัวแยกสัญญาณ VGA; สวิตช์ VGA
es: Electrónica > Accesorios electrónicos > Divisores y conmutadores de audio y vídeo > Divisores y conmutadores VGA: Divisores VGA; Conmutadores VGA